trunk/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="personal_pronouns__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ona</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ono</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oni</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>one</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ona</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mene</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebe</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njega</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nju</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njega</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njih</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mene</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebe</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njega</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nje</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njega</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njih</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>meni</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njemu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njoj</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njemu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nama</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vama</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njima</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mnom</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tobom</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njim</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njom</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njim</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nama</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vama</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njima</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>meni</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njemu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njoj</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njemu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nama</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vama</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njima</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="personal pronouns"><i/><par n="personal_pronouns__prn"/></e>
